trunk/apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="c’hoarzh/in__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omp</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ont</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emp</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ec’h</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jout</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jomp</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>joc’h</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jont</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jod</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imp</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oc’h</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fen</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fes</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fe</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>femp</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fec’h</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fent</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fed</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jen</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jes</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jemp</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jec’h</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jent</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jed</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omp</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>	  
	  
	  
    </pardef>

    <e lm="c’hoarzhin"><i>c’hoarzh</i><par n="c’hoarzh/in__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mousc’hoarzhin"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ousc’hoarzh</i><par n="c’hoarzh/in__vblex"/></e>
